Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1607
Sale made in violation of sections; buyer recovery.

Any sale made in violation of sections 69-1601 to 69-1607 shall entitle the buyer to recover any sums paid to the seller pursuant to the transaction along with the actual damages, including any incidental and consequential damages, sustained by the buyer by reason of the violation, together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

Laws 1974, LB 212, § 7.